fr: Taille de boule de coton: Jumbo; Grande; Moyen; Mini; Petite; Autre
tr: Pamuk topu boyutu: Jumbo; Büyük; Orta; Mini; Küçük; Diğer
pl: Rozmiar wacików: Jumbo; Duży; Średni; Min.; Mała; Inne
sv: Bomullsbollstorlek: Jumbo; Stor; Medium; Mini; Liten; Övrigt
nl: Wattenbolgrootte: Jumbo; Groot; Medium; Mini; Klein; Andere
it: Taglia del batuffolo di cotone: Jumbo; Large; Medio; Mini; Small; Altro
hu: Vattagolyó mérete: Jumbo; Nagy; Közepes; Mini; Kicsi; Egyéb
nb: Bomullsballstørrelse: Jumbo; Stor; Middels; Mini; Liten; Annet
zh-CN: 棉球大小: 特大; 大; 中度; 迷你; 小; 其他
pt-BR: Tamanho da bola de algodão: Jumbo; Grande; Médio; Mini; Pequena; Outro
ja: コットンボールサイズ: ジャンボ; 大; 中挽き; ミニ; 小; その他
th: ขนาดสำลีก้อน: จัมโบ้; ใหญ่; ปานกลาง; มินิ; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 棉球尺寸: 巨型紗; 大; 中等; 迷你裙; 小; 其他
ru: Размер ватного шарика: Джамбо; Большой; Средний; Мини; Маленький; Другой
ro-RO: Dimensiunea bilelor din bumbac: Jumbo; Mare; Medie; Mini; Mcă; Altele
fi: Vanupallon koko: Jumbo; Suuri; Keskimääräinen; Mini; Pieni; Muu
de: Wattebauschgröße: Jumbo; Groß; Mittel; Mini; Klein; Sonstiges
el: Μέγεθος βαμβακερής μπάλας: Jumbo; Μεγάλη; Μέση; Μίνι; Μικρός; Άλλο
cs: Velikost vatového tamponku: Jumbo; Velká; Střední; Mini; Malá; Jiné
sk-SK: Veľkosť vatovej guličky: Jumbo; Veľký; Stredný; Mini; Malý; Iné
es: Tamaño de bola de algodón: Jumbo; Grande; Medio; Mini; Pequeño; Otros
da: Vatkulestørrelse: Jumbo; Stor; Medium; Mini; Lille; Andet
pt-PT: Tamanho da bola de algodão: Jumbo; Grande; Moagem média; Mini; Pequeno; Outro
vi: Kích thước bông gòn: Jumbo; Lớn; Vừa; Siêu ngắn; Nhỏ; Khác
en: Cotton ball size: Jumbo; Large; Medium; Mini; Small; Other
sl-SI: Velikost bombažne kroglice: Jumbo; Velika; Medij; Mini; Majhna; Drugo
ko: 솜뭉치 크기: 점보; 라지; 중간; 미니; 스몰; 기타
lt-LT: Vatos rutuliuko dydis: „Jumbo“; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mini; Mažas; Kita
hr-HR: Veličina pamučne kuglice: Jumbo; Velika; Polusuho; Mini; Mala; Ostalo
bg-BG: Размер на памучните топчета: Джъмбо; Голяма; Средна; Мини; Малка; Други